Utah statutes.
63M-1-415.   Indian tribes -- Application.

(1)  For purposes of this section:

(a)  "Indian reservation" is as defined in Section 9-9-210.

(b)  "Indian tribe" is as defined in Subsection 9-9-402(6).

(c)  "Tribal applicant" means the governing authority of a tribe that meets the requirements for designation as an enterprise zone under Subsection (2).

(2)  Indian tribes may apply for designation of an area within an Indian reservation as an enterprise zone.

(3)  The tribal applicant shall follow the application procedure for a municipal applicant in this part except for the population requirement in Subsections 63M-1-404(2)(a) and (b).



Amended by Chapter 114, 2008 General Session 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

